District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.113

Foreign corporations — Withdrawal from doing business in District.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 225, ch. 269, § 113
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 85-254, § 26
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(tt), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.113.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.14.
1973 Ed., § 29-934.